Utah statutes.
76-3-204.   Misdemeanor conviction -- Term of imprisonment.
A person who has been convicted of a misdemeanor may be sentenced to
imprisonment as follows:
(1)  In the case of a class A misdemeanor, for a term not exceeding one year;
(2)  In the case of a class B misdemeanor, for a term not exceeding six
months;
(3)  In the case of a class C misdemeanor, for a term not exceeding ninety
days.
